Massachusetts, session 194th, S1543.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 75 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 36E the following section:-
Section 36F. (a) There shall be at the University of Massachusetts medical school in
Worcester a nursing workforce center. The purpose of the nursing workforce center shall be to
gather data, research and provide analysis to advise policy leaders on how to address the current
and future nursing workforce needs of nurses and others who support nursing care and to provide
recommendations to advance nursing science and practice in the commonwealth. The nursing
workforce center shall be administered by an executive director who shall be appointed by the
dean of the University of Massachusetts medical school. The nursing workforce center shall be
subject to the direction and oversight of the executive office of health and human services.
(b) The nursing workforce center shall:
of 3

(1) Convene a diverse group of key stakeholders including nurses, health care providers,
business and industry leaders, consumers, state agencies, legislators and educators to collaborate
on strategies to improve the nursing workforce and speak with one voice on issues impacting the
nursing workforce;
(2) Conduct research on best practices and quality patient outcomes across settings;
(3) Prepare and disseminate written reports and recommendations regarding the current
and future status and trends of the nursing workforce;
(4) Research, analyze and report data related to the recruitment and retention of the
nursing workforce;
(5) Develop and implement strategies to recruit and retain nurses in the commonwealth;
(6) Recommend systemic changes to the nursing workforce pipeline;
(7) Foster collaboration among members of the health care community to achieve policy
consensus, promote diversity across the profession and within the health care workforce and
enhance the knowledge of nursing practice;
(8) Encourage initiatives to support nursing excellence through innovative strategies such
as recognition programs, incentives for professional growth and activities that enhance the
visibility and positive perception of the nursing profession across the commonwealth;
(9) Provide consultation, technical assistance and information related to nursing resources
within and outside of the commonwealth and serve as a clearinghouse on nursing practice and
nursing workforce data; and
of 3

(10) Examine and engage in other matters deemed appropriate by the executive office of
health and human services.
(c) Annually, the nursing workforce center shall submit a report summarizing its
activities and made policy recommendations to the secretary of health and human services, the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means, the chairs of the joint committee
on public health, the chairs of the joint committee on health care financing and the chairs joint
committee on higher education. The report shall be made publicly available on the nursing
workforce center’s website.
SECTION 2. The first nursing workforce center report, established pursuant section 36F
of Chapter 75 of the General Laws, shall be submitted not later than 1 year after the effective
date of this act.
of 3